Hawaii statutes.
§264-10 Deposit of fees, etc.; inspectors.
Fees collected pursuant to section 264-7 shall be deposited in the state
highway fund.

The department of transportation shall employ
one or more persons who shall inspect the work of the permit holder and require
that it be done in accordance with sections 264-8 and 264-9. [L 1967, c 163, pt
of §2; HRS §264-10]

Cross References

State highway fund, generally, see §248-9.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next